Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB683.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1081 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1081. Duties of Superintendents.--(a) The duties of district superintendents shall be to [visit]:(1) Visit personally as often as practicable the several schools under his supervision[, to note].(2) Note the courses and methods of instruction and branches taught[, to give].(3) Give such directions in the art and methods of teaching in each school as he deems expedient and necessary[, and to 1234567891011121314151617181920 report].(4) Report to the board of school directors any insufficiency found, so that each school shall be equal to the grade for which it was established and that there may be, as far as practicable, uniformity in the courses of study in the schools of the several grades[, and such other].(5) Assign personnel in a manner that produces student-to-teacher ratios that are not greater than:(i) Twenty-four (24) students to one (1) teacher in kindergarten, with no class being larger than twenty-nine (29) students. If there are more than twenty-four (24) students to one (1) teacher in a class, the superintendent must assign a full-time teacher's aide or second teacher to the class.(ii) Twenty-four (24) students to one (1) teacher in grades one, two and three, with no class being larger than thirty (30) students.(iii) Twenty-five (25) students to one (1) teacher in grades four, five and six, with no class being larger than thirty-five (35) students.(iv) Twenty-four (24) students to one (1) teacher in grades seven, eight, nine, ten, eleven and twelve, with no class being larger than thirty-five (35) students.(6) Notify the parents of each student in a class that exceeds the student-to-teacher ratio required under paragraph (5) no later than ten (10) days after the date on which the class exceeded the maximum student-to-teacher ratio. The notification shall state the reason for the student-to-teacher ratio in the class exceeding the maximum ratio and describe the measures that the superintendent will take to reduce the class size to comply with paragraph (5). No later than thirty (30) 20250HB0683PN0697 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 days after the date on which a superintendent knows that a class exceeds the maximum student-to-teacher ratio, the superintendent shall provide a plan to the Department of Education for reducing the class size in compliance with paragraph (5) by the beginning of the next semester or within ninety (90) days, whichever is later.(7) Perform other duties as may be required by the board of school directors.(b) Subsection (a)(5) or (6) shall not be construed to limit the number of students per teacher in a classroom for classes with a primary group instruction focus, including physical education or instruction in choral, band or orchestra music.(c) The district superintendent shall have a seat on the board of school directors of the district, and the right to speak on all matters before the board, but not to vote.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0683PN0697 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516